Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-530
Enterprise project;
report.

The Chief Information Officer shall report annually
to the Governor and the Appropriations Committee of the Legislature on the
status of enterprise projects. The
report submitted to the committee shall be submitted electronically.

Laws 1996, LB 1190, § 13;

Laws 2000, LB 1349, § 10;

R.S.Supp.,2000, § 81-11,102;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 300;

Laws 2008, LB823, § 11;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 246.